apertium-ces-rus.ces.dix
    <pardef n="jm/éno__n">
      <e><p><l>éno</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>éna</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>énu</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>éno</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>énem</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>éně</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>énu</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>éno</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>éna</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>énům</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>éna</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ény</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>énech</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>éna</l><r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="windsurfin/g__n">
      <e><p><l>g</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>g</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gem</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gy</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gů</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gům</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gy</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gy</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zích</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gy</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="no/ha__n">
      <e><p><l>ha</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hy</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ze</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hu</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hou</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ze</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ho</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hy</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hou</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hám</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hy</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hami</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hou</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hy</l><r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__právo">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ům</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="práv/o__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r>o<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="BASE__právo"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ech</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="Kosov/o__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="BASE__právo"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ech</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="vojsk/o__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r>o<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="BASE__právo"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ách</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="náz/ev__n">
      <e><p><l>ev</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vu</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vu</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ev</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vem</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vu</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ve</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vy</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vů</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vům</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vy</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vy</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vech</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vy</l><r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="poč/et__n">
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tem</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ty</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tů</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tům</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ty</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ty</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tech</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ty</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="leasing"><i>leasin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dialog"><i>dialo</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dláto"><i>dlát</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="epilog"><i>epilo</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gang"><i>gan</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gulag"><i>gula</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="holding"><i>holdin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jméno"><i>jm</i><par n="jm/éno__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kladivo"><i>kladiv</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="počet"><i>poč</i><par n="poč/et__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monolog"><i>monolo</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="noha"><i>no</i><par n="no/ha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="název"><i>náz</i><par n="náz/ev__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pečivo"><i>pečiv</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slang"><i>slan</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veto"><i>vet</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vojsko"><i>vojsk</i><par n="vojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="windsurfing"><i>windsurfin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kosovo"><i>Kosov</i><par n="Kosov/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="brdo"><i>brd</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cigáro"><i>cigár</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="devatero"><i>devater</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duševno"><i>duševn</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eso"><i>es</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ghetto"><i>ghett</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inkognito"><i>incognit</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="judo"><i>jud</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kladivo"><i>kladiv</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="korzo"><i>kors</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvarteto"><i>kvartet</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="libero"><i>liber</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lino"><i>lin</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mazivo"><i>maziv</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motto"><i>mot</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neprávo"><i>nepráv</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="osivo"><i>osiv</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peso"><i>pes</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="piáno"><i>pián</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poleno"><i>polen</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="proso"><i>pros</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rondo"><i>rond</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sedmero"><i>sedmer</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sporožiro"><i>sporožir</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tempo"><i>temp</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="torzo"><i>tors</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="učivo"><i>učiv</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="věno"><i>věn</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bowling"><i>bowlin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clearing"><i>clearin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="curling"><i>curlin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doping"><i>dopin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dumping" r="LR"><p><l>dampin</l><r>dumpin</r></p><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fixing"><i>fixin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gang"><i>gan</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grog"><i>gro</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="happening"><i>happenin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jang"><i>jan</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jumping"><i>jumpin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leasing"><i>leasin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="log"><i>lo</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monitoring"><i>monitorin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nekrolog"><i>nekrolo</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pong"><i>pon</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rafting"><i>raftin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ring"><i>rin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="shopping"><i>shoppin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skríning"><i>skrínin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slang"><i>slan</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snowboarding"><i>snowboardin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="string"><i>strin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tung"><i>tun</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="demo"><i>dem</i><par n="práv/o__n"/></e>
